District of Columbia statutes.
50-1731.08

Education.

The Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles shall include educational information on the use of mobile telephones and other electronic devices while driving in the District’s Driver and Motorcycle Operator’s Study Guide. The Director shall also include questions pertaining to distracted driving and mobile telephone usage while driving on the driver’s license exam.

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-124, § 8, 51 DCR 1541

History